Utah statutes.
77-15-3.   Petition for inquiry as to defendant or prisoner -- Filing -- Contents.

(1)  Whenever a person charged with a public offense or serving a sentence of imprisonment is or becomes incompetent to proceed, as defined in this chapter, a petition may be filed in the district court of the county where the charge is pending or where the person is confined.

(2) (a)  The petition shall contain a certificate that it is filed in good faith and on reasonable grounds to believe the defendant is incompetent to proceed.  The petition shall contain a recital of the facts, observations, and conversations with the defendant that have formed the basis for the petition.  If filed by defense counsel, the petition shall contain such information without invading the lawyer-client privilege.

(b)  The petition may be based upon knowledge or information and belief and may be filed by the party alleged incompetent to proceed, any person acting on his behalf, the prosecuting attorney, or any person having custody or supervision over the person.

